Arkansas, session 2025, HB1736.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF ARKANSAS:

SECTION 1. Arkansas Code § 4-9-406(d), concerning the ineffectiveness
of certain assignments under the Uniform Commercial Code, is amended to read
as follows:
(d) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (e) subsections (e) and
(k) and §§ 4-2A-303 and 4-9-407, and subject to subsection (h), a term in an
agreement between an account debtor and an assignor or in a promissory note
is ineffective to the extent that it:
(1) prohibits, restricts, or requires the consent of the account
debtor or person obligated on the promissory note to the assignment or
transfer of, or the creation, attachment, perfection, or enforcement of a
security interest in, the account, chattel paper, payment intangible, or
promissory note; or
(2) provides that the assignment or transfer or the creation,
attachment, perfection, or enforcement of the security interest may give rise
to a default, breach, right of recoupment, claim, defense, termination, right
of termination, or remedy under the account, chattel paper, payment
intangible, or promissory note.

*ANS151*
03/10/2025 5:55:12 PM ANS151

HB1736
SECTION 2. Arkansas Code § 4-9-406(f), concerning the ineffectiveness
of certain legal restrictions on assignments under the Uniform Commercial
Code, is amended to read as follows:
(f) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (k) and §§ 4-2A-303 and
4-9-407 and subject to subsections (h) and (i), a rule of law, statute, or
regulation that prohibits, restricts, or requires the consent of a
government, governmental body or official, or account debtor to the
assignment or transfer of, or creation of a security interest in, an account
or chattel paper is ineffective to the extent that the rule of law, statute,
or regulation:
(1) prohibits, restricts, or requires the consent of the
government, governmental body or official, or account debtor to the
assignment or transfer of, or the creation, attachment, perfection, or
enforcement of a security interest in the account or chattel paper; or
(2) provides that the assignment or transfer or the creation,
attachment, perfection, or enforcement of the security interest may give rise
to a default, breach, right of recoupment, claim, defense, termination, right
of termination, or remedy under the account or chattel paper.

SECTION 3. Arkansas Code § 4-9-406, concerning the discharge of an
account debtor under the Uniform Commercial Code, is amended to add an
additional subsection to read as follows:
(k) Subsections (d), (f), and (j) do not apply to a security interest
in an ownership interest in a general partnership, limited partnership, or
limited liability company.

SECTION 4. Arkansas Code § 4-9-408(a), concerning the ineffectiveness
of certain assignments under the Uniform Commercial Code, is amended to read
as follows:
(a) Except as otherwise provided in subsection (b) subsections (b) and
(g), a term in a promissory note or in an agreement between an account debtor
and a debtor which relates to a health-care-insurance receivable or a general
intangible, including a contract, permit, license, or franchise, and which
term prohibits, restricts, or requires the consent of the person obligated on
the promissory note or the account debtor to, the assignment or transfer of,
or creation, attachment, or perfection of a security interest in, the
03/10/2025 5:55:12 PM ANS151

HB1736
promissory note, health-care-insurance receivable, or general intangible, is
ineffective to the extent that the term:
(1) would impair the creation, attachment, or perfection of a
security interest; or
(2) provides that the assignment or transfer or the creation,
attachment, or perfection of the security interest may give rise to a
default, breach, right of recoupment, claim, defense, termination, right of
termination, or remedy under the promissory note, health-care-insurance
receivable, or general intangible.

SECTION 5. Arkansas Code § 4-9-408(c), concerning the ineffectiveness
of certain legal restrictions on assignments under the Uniform Commercial
Code, is amended to read as follows:
(c) A Except as otherwise provided in subsection (g), a rule of law,
statute, or regulation that prohibits, restricts, or requires the consent of
a government, governmental body or official, person obligated on a promissory
note, or account debtor to the assignment or transfer of, or creation of a
security interest in, a promissory note, health-care-insurance receivable, or
general intangible, including a contract, permit, license, or franchise
between an account debtor and a debtor, is ineffective to the extent that the
rule of law, statute, or regulation:
(1) would impair the creation, attachment, or perfection of a
security interest; or
(2) provides that the assignment or transfer or the creation,
attachment, or perfection of the security interest may give rise to a
default, breach, right of recoupment, claim, defense, termination, right of
termination, or remedy under the promissory note, health-care-insurance
receivable, or general intangible.

SECTION 6. Arkansas Code § 4-9-408, concerning restrictions on certain
assignments under the Uniform Commercial Code, is amended to add an
additional subsection to read as follows:
(g) This section does not apply to a security interest in an ownership
interest in a general partnership, limited partnership, or limited liability
company.

03/10/2025 5:55:12 PM ANS151